Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.375, as amended by section 24, chapter 32, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
181A.375. (1) The Board on Public Safety Standards and Training shall  establish the following
policy  committees:
(a) Corrections Policy Committee;
(b) Fire Policy Committee;
(c) Police Policy Committee;
(d) Telecommunications Policy Committee; and
(e) Private Security Policy Committee.
(2) The members of  each policy committee shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson for
the policy committee. Only members of the policy committee who are also members of the board  are
eligible to serve as a chairperson or vice chairperson.  The vice chairperson may act as chairperson
in the absence of the chairperson.
(3) The Corrections Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the corrections discipline;
(b) The chief administrative officer of the training division of the Department of Corrections;
(c) A security manager from the Department of Corrections recommended by the  Director of the
Department of Corrections; and
(d) The following, who  may not be current board members, appointed by the chairperson of the
board:
(A) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association;
(B) Two persons recommended by and representing the Oregon Sheriff’s Jail Command Council;
(C) One person recommended  by and representing a statewide association of community cor-
rections directors;
(D) One nonmanagement corrections officer employed by the Department of Corrections;
(E) One corrections officer who  is employed by the Department of Corrections at a women’s
correctional facility and who is a member of a bargaining unit;
(F) Two nonmanagement corrections officers; and
(G) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never been employed or utilized as a corrections officer  or as a parole and probation
officer; and
Enrolled House Bill 2916 (HB 2916-INTRO) Page 1
(ii) Is not related within the second  degree by affinity or consanguinity to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a corrections officer or parole and probation officer.
(4) The Fire Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the fire service discipline; and
(b) The following, who  may not be current board members, appointed by the chairperson of the
board:
[(A) One person recommended by and representing a statewide association of fire instructors; ]
(A) One person representing fire instructors and recommended by a fire training associ-
ation;
(B) One person recommended by and representing a statewide association of fire marshals;
(C) One person recommended by and representing community college fire programs;
(D) One nonmanagement firefighter recommended by a statewide organization of firefighters;
(E) One person representing the forest  protection agencies and recommended by the State
Forestry Department; and
(F) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never been employed or utilized as a fire service professional; and
(ii) Is not related within the second  degree by affinity or consanguinity to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a fire service professional.
(5) The Police Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the law enforcement discipline; and
(b) The following, who may not be current board members, appointed by the  chairperson of the
board:
(A) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon Association Chiefs of Police;
(B) Two persons recommended by and representing the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association;
(C) One command officer recommended by and representing the Oregon State Police;
(D) Three nonmanagement law enforcement officers; and
(E) Two persons representing the public:
(i) Who have never been employed or utilized as  a police officer, certified reserve officer, re-
serve officer or regulatory specialist;
(ii) Who are not related within the second degree by affinity  or consanguinity to a person who
is employed or utilized as a police officer, certified reserve officer, reserve  officer or regulatory
specialist; and
(iii) One of whom is a member of a marginalized or historically underrepresented community.
(6) The Telecommunications Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the telecommunications discipline; and
(b) The following, who may not be current board members, appointed by the  chairperson of the
board:
(A) Two persons recommended by  and representing a statewide association of public safety
communications officers;
(B) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon Association Chiefs of Police;
(C) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon State Police;
(D) Two persons representing telecommunicators;
(E) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association;
(F) One person recommended by and representing the Oregon Fire Chiefs Association;
(G) One person recommended by and representing the  Emergency Medical Services Program of
the Oregon Health Authority;
(H) One person representing emergency medical services providers and recommended by  a
statewide association dealing with fire medical issues; and
(I) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never been employed or utilized as a telecommunicator or an emergency medical dis-
patcher; and
Enrolled House Bill 2916 (HB 2916-INTRO) Page 2
(ii) Is not related within the second  degree by affinity or consanguinity to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a telecommunicator or an emergency medical dispatcher.
(7) The Private Security Policy Committee consists of:
(a) All of the board members who represent the private security industry; and
(b) The following, who  may not be current board members, appointed by the chairperson of the
board:
(A) One person representing unarmed private security professionals;
(B) One person representing armed private security professionals;
(C) One person representing the health care industry;
(D) One person representing the manufacturing industry;
(E) One person representing the retail industry;
(F) One person representing the hospitality industry;
(G) One  person representing private business or a governmental entity that utilizes private se-
curity  services;
(H) One person representing persons who monitor alarm systems;
(I) Two persons who are investigators licensed under ORS  703.430, one of whom is recommended
by the Oregon State Bar and one of whom is in private practice; and
(J) One person representing the public who:
(i) Has never  been employed or utilized as a private security provider, as defined in ORS
181A.840, or an investigator, as defined in ORS 703.401; and
(ii) Is not related within the second degree by affinity or consanguinity  to a person who is em-
ployed or utilized as a private security provider, as defined in ORS 181A.840, or an investigator,  as
defined in ORS 703.401.
(8) In making appointments to the policy committees under this section,  the chairperson of the
board shall seek to reflect the  diversity of the state’s population. An appointment made by the
chairperson of the board  must be ratified by the board before the appointment is effective. The
chairperson of the board may remove an  appointed member for just cause. An appointment to a
policy committee that is based on the  member’s employment is automatically revoked if the member
changes employment. The  chairperson of the board shall fill a vacancy in the same manner as
making an initial appointment.  The term of an appointed member is two years. An appointed member
may be appointed to a second term.
(9) A policy committee may meet at such times and places as determined by the policy  commit-
tee in consultation with the Department of Public Safety Standards and  Training. A majority of a
policy committee constitutes  a quorum to conduct business. A policy committee may create sub-
committees if needed.
(10)(a) Each policy committee shall develop  policies, requirements, standards and rules relating
to its specific discipline. A policy  committee shall submit its policies, requirements, standards and
rules to the board for the  board’s consideration. When a policy committee submits a policy, re-
quirement, standard or rule to the board for the board’s consideration, the board shall:
(A) Approve the policy, requirement, standard or rule;
(B) Disapprove the policy, requirement, standard or rule; or
(C) Defer a decision and return the matter to  the policy committee for revision or reconsider-
ation.
(b) The board  may defer a decision and return a matter submitted by a policy committee under
paragraph (a)  of this subsection only once. If a policy, requirement, standard or rule that was re-
turned to a policy committee is resubmitted to  the board, the board shall take all actions necessary
to implement the policy, requirement, standard or rule unless the board disapproves the  policy, re-
quirement, standard or rule.
(c) Disapproval  of a policy, requirement, standard or rule under paragraph (a) or (b) of this
subsection requires a two-thirds vote by the members of the board.
(11) At any time after submitting a matter to the board, the chairperson of the  policy committee
may withdraw the matter from the board’s consideration.
Enrolled House Bill 2916 (HB 2916-INTRO) Page 3
Passed by House February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2916 (HB 2916-INTRO) Page 4